Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 9 Temporary Substitute Conservators

29-3-90.
Appointment of temporary substitute conservator; length of appointment; powers; notice; removal.

Upon its own motion or on the petition of any interested party, including the minor, the court may appoint a temporary substitute conservator for a minor if it appears to the court that the best interest of the minor requires immediate action.

The temporary substitute conservator shall be appointed for a specified period not to exceed 120 days.

The court shall appoint as temporary substitute conservator the county guardian or some other appropriate person who shall serve the best interest of the minor.

Except as otherwise ordered by the court, a temporary substitute conservator has the powers set forth in the order of appointment. The authority of the previously appointed conservator is suspended for as long as the temporary substitute conservator has authority.

Notice of the appointment of a temporary substitute conservator shall be served personally on the minor. Notice of the appointment shall be served personally on the previously appointed conservator at the last address provided by that conservator to the court. Notice of the appointment shall be mailed by first-class mail to the surety of the previously appointed conservator and to the minor’s guardian, if any.

The court may remove the temporary substitute conservator at any time. A temporary substitute conservator shall make any report and shall give any bond the court deems appropriate. In all other respects, the provisions of this chapter apply to the temporary substitute conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-91.
Appointment of successor conservator; notice; hearing and bond requirements.

The court shall appoint a successor conservator upon the resignation, death, or revocation of the letters of the conservator if the appointment of a successor conservator is in the best interest of the minor. The court shall select the successor conservator in the manner provided in Code Section 29-3-7.

In the event of the resignation or death of the conservator, notice of the proceeding for appointment of a successor conservator shall be given as provided in Code Sections 29-3-80 and 29-3-81. In all other cases, notice of the proceeding for appointment of a successor conservator shall be served personally on the minor and a guardian ad litem appointed for the minor. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the guardian of the minor, if any, and to the following relatives of the minor, in the following order of preference, who are persons other than the proposed successor conservator:

Any parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated;

If there is no parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated, the adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need be served;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need be served; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1.

After any hearing the court deems appropriate, the court shall enter an order appointing the successor conservator and require that bond be posted in the amount set forth in Code Section 29-3-40.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-3-92.
Delivery of property; annual return; liability of surety.

Upon the appointment of a successor conservator, the predecessor conservator or the personal representative of a deceased predecessor conservator shall deliver to the successor conservator all property of the minor held by the conservator and shall submit a final return covering the period since the conservator’s last annual return. The surety of the predecessor conservator shall be liable for all acts of the conservator in relation to the minor’s property up to the time of the receipt of all of the minor’s property by the successor conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.